Illinois, session 104th, SB1651.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Statute on Statutes is amended by changing 5Section 1.42 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 70/1.42)7    Sec. 1.42. Developmental disability. 8    (a) Except where the context indicates otherwise, in any 9rule, contract, or other document a reference to a 10developmentally disabled person or a similar reference shall 11be considered a reference to a person with a developmental 12disability and a reference to the developmentally disabled or 13a similar reference shall be considered a reference to persons 14with developmental disabilities.15    (b) Except where the context indicates otherwise, in any 16rule, contract, or other document the term "developmental 17disability" shall include a disability attributable to 18Prader-Willi syndrome. 19    (c) Except where the context indicates otherwise, whenever 20there is a reference in any Act to "development disability" 21this term shall be construed to include a disability 22attributable to Prader-Willi syndrome. 23    (d) The use of either "developmentally disabled" or   SB1651- 2 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1"developmental disability" or "the developmentally disabled" 2or "persons with developmental disabilities" shall not 3invalidate any rule, contract, or other document.4(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.) 5    Section 10. The Mental Health and Developmental 6Disabilities Code is amended by changing Section 1-106 as 7follows: 8    (405 ILCS 5/1-106)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1-106)9    Sec. 1-106. "Developmental disability" means a severe, 10chronic disability, other than mental illness, found to be 11closely related to an intellectual disability because this 12condition results in impairment of general intellectual 13functioning or adaptive behavior similar to that of persons 14with ID, and requires services similar to those required for a 15person with an intellectual disability. In addition, a 16developmental disability: (1) is manifested before the 17individual reaches 22 years of age; (2) is likely to continue 18indefinitely; (3) results in substantial functional 19limitations in three or more of the following areas of major 20life activity: self-care, receptive and expressive language, 21learning, mobility, self-direction, capacity for independent 22living, or economic self-sufficiency; and (4) reflects the 23individual's need for a combination and sequence of special 24interdisciplinary or generic services, individualized   SB1651- 3 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1supports, or other forms of assistance that are of lifelong or 2extended duration and are individually planned and 3coordinated. "Developmental disability" includes a disability 4attributable to Prader-Willi syndrome. This definition does 5not supersede the "developmental disability" definition in 6Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act 7which is required to be applied under that Act for the purpose 8of mandatory reporting.9(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.) 10    Section 15. The Developmental Disability and Mental 11Disability Services Act is amended by changing Section 2-3 as 12follows: 13    (405 ILCS 80/2-3)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 1802-3)14    Sec. 2-3. As used in this Article, unless the context 15requires otherwise: 16    (a) "Agency" means an agency or entity licensed by the 17Department pursuant to this Article or pursuant to the 18Community Residential Alternatives Licensing Act.19    (b) "Department" means the Department of Human Services, 20as successor to the Department of Mental Health and 21Developmental Disabilities.22    (c) "Home-based services" means services provided to an 23adult with a mental disability who lives in his or her own 24home. These services include but are not limited to:  SB1651- 4 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1        (1) home health services;2        (2) case management;3        (3) crisis management;4        (4) training and assistance in self-care;5        (5) personal care services;6        (6) habilitation and rehabilitation services;7        (7) employment-related services;8        (8) respite care; and9        (9) other skill training that enables a person to 10    become self-supporting.11    (d) "Legal guardian" means a person appointed by a court 12of competent jurisdiction to exercise certain powers on behalf 13of an adult with a mental disability.14    (e) "Adult with a mental disability" means a person over 15the age of 18 years who lives in his or her own home; who needs 16home-based services, but does not require 24-hour-a-day 17supervision; and who has one of the following conditions: 18severe autism, severe mental illness, a severe or profound 19intellectual disability, or severe and multiple impairments.20    (f) In one's "own home" means that an adult with a mental 21disability lives alone; or that an adult with a mental 22disability is in full-time residence with his or her parents, 23legal guardian, or other relatives; or that an adult with a 24mental disability is in full-time residence in a setting not 25subject to licensure under the Nursing Home Care Act, the 26Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013, the   SB1651- 5 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Child Care Act 2of 1969, as now or hereafter amended, with 3 or fewer other 3adults unrelated to the adult with a mental disability who do 4not provide home-based services to the adult with a mental 5disability.6    (g) "Parent" means the biological or adoptive parent of an 7adult with a mental disability, or a person licensed as a 8foster parent under the laws of this State who acts as a foster 9parent to an adult with a mental disability.10    (h) "Relative" means any of the following relationships by 11blood, marriage or adoption: parent, son, daughter, brother, 12sister, grandparent, uncle, aunt, nephew, niece, great 13grandparent, great uncle, great aunt, stepbrother, stepsister, 14stepson, stepdaughter, stepparent or first cousin.15    (i) "Severe autism" means a lifelong developmental 16disability which is typically manifested before 30 months of 17age and is characterized by severe disturbances in reciprocal 18social interactions; verbal and nonverbal communication and 19imaginative activity; and repertoire of activities and 20interests. A person shall be determined severely autistic, for 21purposes of this Article, if both of the following are 22present:23        (1) Diagnosis consistent with the criteria for 24    autistic disorder in the current edition of the Diagnostic 25    and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.26        (2) Severe disturbances in reciprocal social   SB1651- 6 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1    interactions; verbal and nonverbal communication and 2    imaginative activity; repertoire of activities and 3    interests. A determination of severe autism shall be based 4    upon a comprehensive, documented assessment with an 5    evaluation by a licensed clinical psychologist or 6    psychiatrist. A determination of severe autism shall not 7    be based solely on behaviors relating to environmental, 8    cultural or economic differences.9    (j) "Severe mental illness" means the manifestation of all 10of the following characteristics:11        (1) A primary diagnosis of one of the major mental 12    disorders in the current edition of the Diagnostic and 13    Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders listed below:14            (A) Schizophrenia disorder.15            (B) Delusional disorder.16            (C) Schizo-affective disorder.17            (D) Bipolar affective disorder.18            (E) Atypical psychosis.19            (F) Major depression, recurrent.20        (2) The individual's mental illness must substantially 21    impair his or her functioning in at least 2 of the 22    following areas:23            (A) Self-maintenance.24            (B) Social functioning.25            (C) Activities of community living.26            (D) Work skills.  SB1651- 7 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1        (3) Disability must be present or expected to be 2    present for at least one year.3    A determination of severe mental illness shall be based 4upon a comprehensive, documented assessment with an evaluation 5by a licensed clinical psychologist or psychiatrist, and shall 6not be based solely on behaviors relating to environmental, 7cultural or economic differences.8    (k) "Severe or profound intellectual disability" means a 9manifestation of all of the following characteristics:10        (1) A diagnosis which meets Classification in Mental 11    Retardation or criteria in the current edition of the 12    Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders for 13    severe or profound mental retardation (an IQ of 40 or 14    below). This must be measured by a standardized instrument 15    for general intellectual functioning.16        (2) A severe or profound level of disturbed adaptive 17    behavior. This must be measured by a standardized adaptive 18    behavior scale or informal appraisal by the professional 19    in keeping with illustrations in Classification in Mental 20    Retardation, 1983.21        (3) Disability diagnosed before age of 18.22    A determination of a severe or profound intellectual 23disability shall be based upon a comprehensive, documented 24assessment with an evaluation by a licensed clinical 25psychologist or certified school psychologist or a 26psychiatrist, and shall not be based solely on behaviors   SB1651- 8 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1relating to environmental, cultural or economic differences.2    (l) "Severe and multiple impairments" means the 3manifestation of all of the following characteristics:4        (1) The evaluation determines the presence of a 5    developmental disability which is expected to continue 6    indefinitely, constitutes a substantial disability and is 7    attributable to any of the following:8            (A) Intellectual disability as defined in Section 9        1-116 of the Mental Health and Developmental 10        Disabilities Code.11            (B) Cerebral palsy.12            (C) Epilepsy.13            (D) Autism.14            (E) Prader-Willi syndrome. 15            (F) (E) Any other condition which results in 16        impairment similar to that caused by an intellectual 17        disability and which requires services similar to 18        those required by persons with intellectual 19        disabilities.20        (2) Except as otherwise provided for persons diagnosed 21    with Prader-Willi syndrome, the The evaluation determines 22    multiple disabilities in physical, sensory, behavioral or 23    cognitive functioning which constitute a severe or 24    profound impairment attributable to one or more of the 25    following:26            (A) Physical functioning, which severely impairs   SB1651- 9 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1        the individual's motor performance that may be due to:2                (i) Neurological, psychological or physical 3            involvement resulting in a variety of disabling 4            conditions such as hemiplegia, quadriplegia or 5            ataxia,6                (ii) Severe organ systems involvement such as 7            congenital heart defect,8                (iii) Physical abnormalities resulting in the 9            individual being non-mobile and non-ambulatory or 10            confined to bed and receiving assistance in 11            transferring, or12                (iv) The need for regular medical or nursing 13            supervision such as gastrostomy care and feeding.14            Assessment of physical functioning must be based 15        on clinical medical assessment by a physician licensed 16        to practice medicine in all its branches, using the 17        appropriate instruments, techniques and standards of 18        measurement required by the professional.19            (B) Sensory, which involves severe restriction due 20        to hearing or visual impairment limiting the 21        individual's movement and creating dependence in 22        completing most daily activities. Hearing impairment 23        is defined as a loss of 70 decibels aided or speech 24        discrimination of less than 50% aided. Visual 25        impairment is defined as 20/200 corrected in the 26        better eye or a visual field of 20 degrees or less.   SB1651- 10 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1        Sensory functioning must be based on clinical medical 2        assessment by a physician licensed to practice 3        medicine in all its branches using the appropriate 4        instruments, techniques and standards of measurement 5        required by the professional.6            (C) Behavioral, which involves behavior that is 7        maladaptive and presents a danger to self or others, 8        is destructive to property by deliberately breaking, 9        destroying or defacing objects, is disruptive by 10        fighting, or has other socially offensive behaviors in 11        sufficient frequency or severity to seriously limit 12        social integration. Assessment of behavioral 13        functioning may be measured by a standardized scale or 14        informal appraisal by a clinical psychologist or 15        psychiatrist.16            (D) Cognitive, which involves intellectual 17        functioning at a measured IQ of 70 or below. 18        Assessment of cognitive functioning must be measured 19        by a standardized instrument for general intelligence. 20        Persons diagnosed with Prader-Willi syndrome are 21        exempt from any assessment or evaluation to measure 22        cognitive functioning or IQ for purposes of making a 23        determination of severe and multiple impairments. 24        (3) Except as otherwise provided for persons diagnosed 25    with Prader-Willi syndrome, the The evaluation determines 26    that development is substantially less than expected for   SB1651- 11 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1    the age in cognitive, affective or psychomotor behavior as 2    follows:3            (A) Cognitive, which involves intellectual 4        functioning at a measured IQ of 70 or below. 5        Assessment of cognitive functioning must be measured 6        by a standardized instrument for general intelligence. 7        Persons diagnosed with Prader-Willi syndrome are 8        exempt from any assessment or evaluation to measure 9        cognitive functioning or IQ for purposes of making a 10        determination on whether such persons have severe and 11        multiple impairments. 12            (B) Affective behavior, which involves over and 13        under responding to stimuli in the environment and may 14        be observed in mood, attention to awareness, or in 15        behaviors such as euphoria, anger or sadness that 16        seriously limit integration into society. Affective 17        behavior must be based on clinical assessment using 18        the appropriate instruments, techniques and standards 19        of measurement required by the professional.20            (C) Psychomotor, which includes a severe 21        developmental delay in fine or gross motor skills so 22        that development in self-care, social interaction, 23        communication or physical activity will be greatly 24        delayed or restricted.25        (4) A determination that the disability originated 26    before the age of 18 years.  SB1651- 12 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1    A determination of severe and multiple impairments shall 2be based upon a comprehensive, documented assessment with an 3evaluation by a licensed clinical psychologist or 4psychiatrist. Persons diagnosed with Prader-Willi syndrome are 5exempt from any assessment or evaluation to measure cognitive 6functioning or IQ for purposes of making determinations on 7whether such persons have severe and multiple impairments 8eligible for home and community-based services. 910    If the examiner is a licensed clinical psychologist, 11ancillary evaluation of physical impairment, cerebral palsy or 12epilepsy must be made by a physician licensed to practice 13medicine in all its branches.14    Regardless of the discipline of the examiner, ancillary 15evaluation of visual impairment must be made by an 16ophthalmologist or a licensed optometrist.17    Regardless of the discipline of the examiner, ancillary 18evaluation of hearing impairment must be made by an 19otolaryngologist or an audiologist with a certificate of 20clinical competency.21    The only exception to the above is in the case of a person 22with cerebral palsy or epilepsy who, according to the 23eligibility criteria listed below, has multiple impairments 24which are only physical and sensory. In such a case, a 25physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 26may serve as the examiner.  SB1651- 13 -LRB104 08924 KTG 18979 b1    (m) "Twenty-four-hour-a-day supervision" means 224-hour-a-day care by a trained mental health or developmental 3disability professional on an ongoing basis.4(Source: P.A. 102-972, eff. 1-1-23.)